Illinois, session 104th, HB4006.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 110-5 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-5)7    Sec. 110-5. Determining the amount of bail and conditions 8of release. 9    (a) In determining which conditions of pretrial release, 10if any, will reasonably ensure the appearance of a defendant 11as required or the safety of any other person or the community 12and the likelihood of compliance by the defendant with all the 13conditions of pretrial release, the court shall, on the basis 14of available information, take into account such matters as:15        (1) the nature and circumstances of the offense 16    charged;17        (2) the weight of the evidence against the defendant, 18    except that the court may consider the admissibility of 19    any evidence sought to be excluded;20        (3) the history and characteristics of the defendant, 21    including:22            (A) the defendant's character, physical and mental 23        condition, family ties, employment, financial   HB4006- 2 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1        resources, length of residence in the community, 2        community ties, past relating to drug or alcohol 3        abuse, conduct, history criminal history, and record 4        concerning appearance at court proceedings; and5            (B) whether, at the time of the current offense or 6        arrest, the defendant was on probation, parole, or on 7        other release pending trial, sentencing, appeal, or 8        completion of sentence for an offense under federal 9        law, or the law of this or any other state;10        (4) the nature and seriousness of the real and present 11    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 12    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 13    case, that would be posed by the defendant's release, if 14    applicable, as required under paragraph (7.5) of Section 4 15    of the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act;16        (5) the nature and seriousness of the risk of 17    obstructing or attempting to obstruct the criminal justice 18    process that would be posed by the defendant's release, if 19    applicable;20        (6) when a person is charged with a violation of a 21    protective order, domestic battery, aggravated domestic 22    battery, kidnapping, aggravated kidnaping, unlawful 23    restraint, aggravated unlawful restraint, cyberstalking, 24    harassment by telephone, harassment through electronic 25    communications, or an attempt to commit first degree 26    murder committed against a spouse or a current or former   HB4006- 3 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1    partner in a cohabitation or dating relationship, 2    regardless of whether an order of protection has been 3    issued against the person, the court may consider the 4    following additional factors:5            (A) whether the alleged incident involved 6        harassment or abuse, as defined in the Illinois 7        Domestic Violence Act of 1986;8            (B) whether the person has a history of domestic 9        violence, as defined in the Illinois Domestic Violence 10        Act of 1986, or a history of other criminal acts;11            (C) the mental health of the person;12            (D) whether the person has a history of violating 13        the orders of any court or governmental entity;14            (E) whether the person has been, or is, 15        potentially a threat to any other person;16            (F) whether the person has access to deadly 17        weapons or a history of using deadly weapons;18            (G) whether the person has a history of abusing 19        alcohol or any controlled substance;20            (H) the severity of the alleged incident that is 21        the basis of the alleged offense, including, but not 22        limited to, the duration of the current incident, and 23        whether the alleged incident involved the use of a 24        weapon, physical injury, sexual assault, 25        strangulation, abuse during the alleged victim's 26        pregnancy, abuse of pets, or forcible entry to gain   HB4006- 4 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1        access to the alleged victim;2            (I) whether a separation of the person from the 3        victim of abuse or a termination of the relationship 4        between the person and the victim of abuse has 5        recently occurred or is pending;6            (J) whether the person has exhibited obsessive or 7        controlling behaviors toward the victim of abuse, 8        including, but not limited to, stalking, surveillance, 9        or isolation of the victim of abuse or the victim's 10        family member or members;11            (K) whether the person has expressed suicidal or 12        homicidal ideations; and13            (L) any other factors deemed by the court to have a 14        reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 15        reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive 16        behavior, or lack of that behavior.17        (7) in cases of stalking or aggravated stalking under 18    Section 12-7.3 or 12-7.4 of the Criminal Code of 2012, the 19    court may consider the factors listed in paragraph (6) and 20    the following additional factors:21            (A) any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 22        history indicative of violent, abusive or assaultive 23        behavior, or lack of that behavior; the evidence may 24        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 25        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 26        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings;  HB4006- 5 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1            (B) any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 2        psychiatric, or other similar social history that 3        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 4        nature, or lack of any such history;5            (C) the nature of the threat that is the basis of 6        the charge against the defendant;7            (D) any statements made by, or attributed to, the 8        defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 9        them;10            (E) the age and physical condition of any person 11        allegedly assaulted by the defendant;12            (F) whether the defendant is known to possess or 13        have access to any weapon or weapons; and14            (G) any other factors deemed by the court to have a 15        reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 16        reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive 17        behavior, or lack of that behavior. 18    (b) The court may use a regularly validated risk 19assessment tool to aid its determination of appropriate 20conditions of release as provided under Section 110-6.4. If a 21risk assessment tool is used, the defendant's counsel shall be 22provided with the information and scoring system of the risk 23assessment tool used to arrive at the determination. The 24defendant retains the right to challenge the validity of a 25risk assessment tool used by the court and to present evidence 26relevant to the defendant's challenge.   HB4006- 6 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1    (c) The court shall impose any conditions that are 2mandatory under subsection (a) of Section 110-10. The court 3may impose any conditions that are permissible under 4subsection (b) of Section 110-10. The conditions of release 5imposed shall be the least restrictive conditions or 6combination of conditions necessary to reasonably ensure the 7appearance of the defendant as required or the safety of any 8other person or persons or the community. 9    (d) When a person is charged with a violation of a 10protective order, the court may order the defendant placed 11under electronic surveillance as a condition of pretrial 12release, as provided in Section 5-8A-7 of the Unified Code of 13Corrections, based on the information collected under 14paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of this Section, the results 15of any assessment conducted, or other circumstances of the 16violation.17    (e) If a person remains in pretrial detention 48 hours 18after having been ordered released with pretrial conditions, 19the court shall hold a hearing to determine the reason for 20continued detention. If the reason for continued detention is 21due to the unavailability or the defendant's ineligibility for 22one or more pretrial conditions previously ordered by the 23court or directed by a pretrial services agency, the court 24shall reopen the conditions of release hearing to determine 25what available pretrial conditions exist that will reasonably 26ensure the appearance of a defendant as required, the safety   HB4006- 7 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1of any other person, and the likelihood of compliance by the 2defendant with all the conditions of pretrial release. The 3inability of the defendant to pay for a condition of release or 4any other ineligibility for a condition of pretrial release 5shall not be used as a justification for the pretrial 6detention of that defendant.7    (f) Prior to the defendant's first appearance, and with 8sufficient time for meaningful attorney-client contact to 9gather information in order to advocate effectively for the 10defendant's pretrial release, the court shall appoint the 11public defender or a licensed attorney at law of this State to 12represent the defendant for purposes of that hearing, unless 13the defendant has obtained licensed counsel. Defense counsel 14shall have access to the same documentary information relied 15upon by the prosecution and presented to the court. 16    (f-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 17before the court, the judge must find that the current 18conditions imposed are necessary to reasonably ensure the 19appearance of the defendant as required, the safety of any 20other person, and the compliance of the defendant with all the 21conditions of pretrial release. The court is not required to 22be presented with new information or a change in circumstance 23to remove pretrial conditions. 24    (g) Electronic monitoring, GPS monitoring, or home 25confinement can only be imposed as a condition of pretrial 26release if a no less restrictive condition of release or   HB4006- 8 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1combination of less restrictive condition of release would 2reasonably ensure the appearance of the defendant for later 3hearings or protect an identifiable person or persons from 4imminent threat of serious physical harm.5    (h) If the court imposes electronic monitoring, GPS 6monitoring, or home confinement, the court shall set forth in 7the record the basis for its finding. A defendant shall be 8given custodial credit for each day he or she was subjected to 9home confinement, at the same rate described in subsection (b) 10of Section 5-4.5-100 of the Unified Code of Corrections. The 11court may give custodial credit to a defendant for each day the 12defendant was subjected to GPS monitoring without home 13confinement or electronic monitoring without home confinement. 14    (i) If electronic monitoring, GPS monitoring, or home 15confinement is imposed, the court shall determine every 60 16days if no less restrictive condition of release or 17combination of less restrictive conditions of release would 18reasonably ensure the appearance, or continued appearance, of 19the defendant for later hearings or protect an identifiable 20person or persons from imminent threat of serious physical 21harm. If the court finds that there are less restrictive 22conditions of release, the court shall order that the 23condition be removed. This subsection takes effect January 1, 242022.25    (j) Crime Victims shall be given notice by the State's 26Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph (1)   HB4006- 9 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime Victims 2and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their opportunity 3at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 4    (k) The State and defendants may appeal court orders 5imposing conditions of pretrial release. 6(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 7102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1104, eff. 81-1-23.) 9    Section 10. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 10changing Section 5-8-4 as follows: 11    (730 ILCS 5/5-8-4)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-8-4)12    Sec. 5-8-4. Concurrent and consecutive terms of 13imprisonment. 14    (a) Concurrent terms; multiple or additional sentences. 15When an Illinois court (i) imposes multiple sentences of 16imprisonment on a defendant at the same time or (ii) imposes a 17sentence of imprisonment on a defendant who is already subject 18to a sentence of imprisonment imposed by an Illinois court, a 19court of another state, or a federal court, then the sentences 20shall run concurrently unless otherwise determined by the 21Illinois court under this Section.22    (b) Concurrent terms; misdemeanor and felony. A defendant 23serving a sentence for a misdemeanor who is convicted of a 24felony and sentenced to imprisonment shall be transferred to   HB4006- 10 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1the Department of Corrections, and the misdemeanor sentence 2shall be merged in and run concurrently with the felony 3sentence.4    (c) Consecutive terms; permissive. The court may impose 5consecutive sentences in any of the following circumstances:6        (1) If, having regard to the nature and circumstances 7    of the offense and the history and character of the 8    defendant, it is the opinion of the court that consecutive 9    sentences are required to protect the public from further 10    criminal conduct by the defendant, the basis for which the 11    court shall set forth in the record.12        (2) If one of the offenses for which a defendant was 13    convicted was a violation of Section 32-5.2 (aggravated 14    false personation of a peace officer) of the Criminal Code 15    of 1961 (720 ILCS 5/32-5.2) or a violation of subdivision 16    (b)(5) or (b)(6) of Section 17-2 of the Criminal Code of 17    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 (720 ILCS 5/17-2) and the 18    offense was committed in attempting or committing a 19    forcible felony. 20        (3) (Blank). If a person charged with a felony commits 21    a separate felony while on pretrial release or in pretrial 22    detention in a county jail facility or county detention 23    facility, then the sentences imposed upon conviction of 24    these felonies may be served consecutively regardless of 25    the order in which the judgments of conviction are 26    entered.  HB4006- 11 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1        (4) (Blank). If a person commits a battery against a 2    county correctional officer or sheriff's employee while 3    serving a sentence or in pretrial detention in a county 4    jail facility, then the sentence imposed upon conviction 5    of the battery may be served consecutively with the 6    sentence imposed upon conviction of the earlier 7    misdemeanor or felony, regardless of the order in which 8    the judgments of conviction are entered.9        (5) (Blank). If a person admitted to pretrial release 10    following conviction of a felony commits a separate felony 11    while released pretrial or if a person detained in a 12    county jail facility or county detention facility 13    following conviction of a felony commits a separate felony 14    while in detention, then any sentence following conviction 15    of the separate felony may be consecutive to that of the 16    original sentence for which the defendant was released 17    pretrial or detained.18        (6) (Blank). If a person is found to be in possession 19    of an item of contraband, as defined in Section 31A-0.1 of 20    the Criminal Code of 2012, while serving a sentence in a 21    county jail or while in pretrial detention in a county 22    jail, the sentence imposed upon conviction for the offense 23    of possessing contraband in a penal institution may be 24    served consecutively to the sentence imposed for the 25    offense for which the person is serving a sentence in the 26    county jail or while in pretrial detention, regardless of   HB4006- 12 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1    the order in which the judgments of conviction are 2    entered.3        (7) (Blank). If a person is sentenced for a violation 4    of a condition of pretrial release under Section 32-10 of 5    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, any 6    sentence imposed for that violation may be served 7    consecutive to the sentence imposed for the charge for 8    which pretrial release had been granted and with respect 9    to which the defendant has been convicted. 10        (8.1) If a person charged with a felony commits a 11    separate felony while on pretrial release or in pretrial 12    detention in a county jail facility or county detention 13    facility, then the sentences imposed upon conviction of 14    these felonies shall be served consecutively regardless of 15    the order in which the judgments of conviction are 16    entered.17        (8.2) If a person commits a battery against a county 18    correctional officer or sheriff's employee while serving a 19    sentence or in pretrial detention in a county jail 20    facility, then the sentence imposed upon conviction of the 21    battery shall be served consecutively with the sentence 22    imposed upon conviction of the earlier misdemeanor or 23    felony, regardless of the order in which the judgments of 24    conviction are entered.25        (9.1) If a person admitted to bail following 26    conviction of a felony commits a separate felony while   HB4006- 13 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1    free on bond or if a person detained in a county jail 2    facility or county detention facility following conviction 3    of a felony commits a separate felony while in detention, 4    then any sentence following conviction of the separate 5    felony shall be consecutive to that of the original 6    sentence for which the defendant was on bond or detained.7        (10.1) If a person is found to be in possession of an 8    item of contraband, as defined in Section 31A-0.1 of the 9    Criminal Code of 2012, while serving a sentence in a 10    county jail or while in pre-trial detention in a county 11    jail, the sentence imposed upon conviction for the offense 12    of possessing contraband in a penal institution shall be 13    served consecutively to the sentence imposed for the 14    offense in which the person is serving sentence in the 15    county jail or serving pretrial detention, regardless of 16    the order in which the judgments of conviction are 17    entered. 18        (11.1) If a person is sentenced for a violation of 19    bail bond under Section 32-10 of the Criminal Code of 1961 20    or the Criminal Code of 2012, any sentence imposed for 21    that violation shall be served consecutive to the sentence 22    imposed for the charge for which bail had been granted and 23    with respect to which the defendant has been convicted. 24    (d) Consecutive terms; mandatory. The court shall impose 25consecutive sentences in each of the following circumstances:26        (1) One of the offenses for which the defendant was   HB4006- 14 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1    convicted was first degree murder or a Class X or Class 1 2    felony and the defendant inflicted severe bodily injury.3        (2) The defendant was convicted of a violation of 4    Section 11-1.20 or 12-13 (criminal sexual assault), 5    11-1.30 or 12-14 (aggravated criminal sexual assault), or 6    11-1.40 or 12-14.1 (predatory criminal sexual assault of a 7    child) of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 8    2012 (720 ILCS 5/11-20.1, 5/11-20.1B, 5/11-20.3, 9    5/11-1.20, 5/12-13, 5/11-1.30, 5/12-14, 5/11-1.40, or 10    5/12-14.1).11        (2.5) The defendant was convicted of a violation of 12    paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (7) of subsection 13    (a) of Section 11-20.1 (child pornography) or of paragraph 14    (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (7) of subsection (a) of 15    Section 11-20.1B or 11-20.3 (aggravated child pornography) 16    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012; 17    or the defendant was convicted of a violation of paragraph 18    (6) of subsection (a) of Section 11-20.1 (child 19    pornography) or of paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of 20    Section 11-20.1B or 11-20.3 (aggravated child pornography) 21    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 22    when the child depicted is under the age of 13. 23        (2.6) The defendant was convicted of:24            (A) a violation of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) 25        of Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal Code of 2012; or26            (B) a violation of paragraph (1) of Section   HB4006- 15 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1        11-20.4 of the Criminal Code of 2012 when the 2        purported child depicted is under the age of 13. 3        (3) The defendant was convicted of armed violence 4    based upon the predicate offense of any of the following: 5    solicitation of murder, solicitation of murder for hire, 6    heinous battery as described in Section 12-4.1 or 7    subdivision (a)(2) of Section 12-3.05, aggravated battery 8    of a senior citizen as described in Section 12-4.6 or 9    subdivision (a)(4) of Section 12-3.05, criminal sexual 10    assault, a violation of subsection (g) of Section 5 of the 11    Cannabis Control Act (720 ILCS 550/5), cannabis 12    trafficking, a violation of subsection (a) of Section 401 13    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act (720 ILCS 14    570/401), controlled substance trafficking involving a 15    Class X felony amount of controlled substance under 16    Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act (720 17    ILCS 570/401), a violation of the Methamphetamine Control 18    and Community Protection Act (720 ILCS 646/), calculated 19    criminal drug conspiracy, or streetgang criminal drug 20    conspiracy.21        (4) The defendant was convicted of the offense of 22    leaving the scene of a motor vehicle crash involving death 23    or personal injuries under Section 11-401 of the Illinois 24    Vehicle Code (625 ILCS 5/11-401) and either: (A) 25    aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, other 26    drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds, or   HB4006- 16 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1    any combination thereof under Section 11-501 of the 2    Illinois Vehicle Code (625 ILCS 5/11-501), (B) reckless 3    homicide under Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 4    the Criminal Code of 2012 (720 ILCS 5/9-3), or (C) both an 5    offense described in item (A) and an offense described in 6    item (B).7        (5) The defendant was convicted of a violation of 8    Section 9-3.1 or Section 9-3.4 (concealment of homicidal 9    death) or Section 12-20.5 (dismembering a human body) of 10    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 (720 11    ILCS 5/9-3.1 or 5/12-20.5).12        (5.5) The defendant was convicted of a violation of 13    Section 24-3.7 (use of a stolen firearm in the commission 14    of an offense) of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 15    Code of 2012.16        (6) If the defendant was in the custody of the 17    Department of Corrections at the time of the commission of 18    the offense, the sentence shall be served consecutive to 19    the sentence under which the defendant is held by the 20    Department of Corrections.21        (7) A sentence under Section 3-6-4 (730 ILCS 5/3-6-4) 22    for escape or attempted escape shall be served consecutive 23    to the terms under which the offender is held by the 24    Department of Corrections.25        (8) (Blank).26        (8.5) (Blank).   HB4006- 17 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1        (9) (Blank). 2        (10) (Blank). 3        (11) (Blank). 4    (e) Consecutive terms; subsequent non-Illinois term. If an 5Illinois court has imposed a sentence of imprisonment on a 6defendant and the defendant is subsequently sentenced to a 7term of imprisonment by a court of another state or a federal 8court, then the Illinois sentence shall run consecutively to 9the sentence imposed by the court of the other state or the 10federal court. That same Illinois court, however, may order 11that the Illinois sentence run concurrently with the sentence 12imposed by the court of the other state or the federal court, 13but only if the defendant applies to that same Illinois court 14within 30 days after the sentence imposed by the court of the 15other state or the federal court is finalized.16    (f) Consecutive terms; aggregate maximums and minimums. 17The aggregate maximum and aggregate minimum of consecutive 18sentences shall be determined as follows:19        (1) For sentences imposed under law in effect prior to 20    February 1, 1978, the aggregate maximum of consecutive 21    sentences shall not exceed the maximum term authorized 22    under Section 5-8-1 (730 ILCS 5/5-8-1) or Article 4.5 of 23    Chapter V for the 2 most serious felonies involved. The 24    aggregate minimum period of consecutive sentences shall 25    not exceed the highest minimum term authorized under 26    Section 5-8-1 (730 ILCS 5/5-8-1) or Article 4.5 of Chapter   HB4006- 18 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1    V for the 2 most serious felonies involved. When sentenced 2    only for misdemeanors, a defendant shall not be 3    consecutively sentenced to more than the maximum for one 4    Class A misdemeanor.5        (2) For sentences imposed under the law in effect on 6    or after February 1, 1978, the aggregate of consecutive 7    sentences for offenses that were committed as part of a 8    single course of conduct during which there was no 9    substantial change in the nature of the criminal objective 10    shall not exceed the sum of the maximum terms authorized 11    under Article 4.5 of Chapter V for the 2 most serious 12    felonies involved, but no such limitation shall apply for 13    offenses that were not committed as part of a single 14    course of conduct during which there was no substantial 15    change in the nature of the criminal objective. When 16    sentenced only for misdemeanors, a defendant shall not be 17    consecutively sentenced to more than the maximum for one 18    Class A misdemeanor. 19    (g) Consecutive terms; manner served. In determining the 20manner in which consecutive sentences of imprisonment, one or 21more of which is for a felony, will be served, the Department 22of Corrections shall treat the defendant as though he or she 23had been committed for a single term subject to each of the 24following:25        (1) The maximum period of a term of imprisonment shall 26    consist of the aggregate of the maximums of the imposed   HB4006- 19 -LRB104 12421 RLC 22707 b1    indeterminate terms, if any, plus the aggregate of the 2    imposed determinate sentences for felonies, plus the 3    aggregate of the imposed determinate sentences for 4    misdemeanors, subject to subsection (f) of this Section.5        (2) The parole or mandatory supervised release term 6    shall be as provided in paragraph (e) of Section 5-4.5-50 7    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-50) for the most serious of the offenses 8    involved.9        (3) The minimum period of imprisonment shall be the 10    aggregate of the minimum and determinate periods of 11    imprisonment imposed by the court, subject to subsection 12    (f) of this Section.13        (4) The defendant shall be awarded credit against the 14    aggregate maximum term and the aggregate minimum term of 15    imprisonment for all time served in an institution since 16    the commission of the offense or offenses and as a 17    consequence thereof at the rate specified in Section 3-6-3 18    (730 ILCS 5/3-6-3). 19    (h) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, 20all sentences imposed by an Illinois court under this Code 21shall run concurrent to any and all sentences imposed under 22the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 23(Source: P.A. 102-350, eff. 8-13-21; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 24102-1104, eff. 12-6-22; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25.)